Vermont, session 2025-2026, S297.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2680a is added to read:
§ 2680a. ELECTRONIC BALLOT RETURN
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Electronic ballot return” means a system that allows a voter to use
electronic means to return a marked local election ballot to the clerk of the
municipality in which the voter is registered.
(2) “Qualified electronic transmission system” means an electronic
transmission system that allows a voter to receive, mark, and return a ballot.
VT LEG #385934 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.297
2026 Page 2 of 3
(b) At an annual or special meeting called for the purpose of authorizing
electronic ballot return, a town, city, or incorporated village may vote to adopt
a system of electronic ballot return for its local elections held by Australian
ballot. A town, city, or incorporated village shall not use electronic ballot
return at the same election at which its voters decide that the system shall be
used.
(c) A town, city, or incorporated village that has adopted a system of
electronic ballot return may send to voters, and receive from voters, ballots
only by means of a qualified electronic transmission system.
(d) A qualified electronic transmission system shall offer and maintain
reasonable data security and voter integrity protections, including:
(1) security auditability;
(2) end-to-end encryption;
(3) end-to-end verifiability;
(4) dual-factor authentication; and
(5) biometric or equivalent digital identity verification technologies.
(e) The clerk of a town, city, or incorporated village that has authorized
electronic ballot return shall ensure that each ballot received through a
qualified electronic transmission system is transcribed to an anonymous paper
ballot. The clerk shall secure, count, maintain, and store a transcribed ballot in
the same manner as any other ballot pursuant to chapter 51 of this title.
VT LEG #385934 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.297
2026 Page 3 of 3
(f) All information or data generated by a voter using a qualified electronic
transmission system shall be confidential and shall not be used for any purpose
other than aggregate voter participation statistics.
(g) The Secretary of State shall publish guidance documents concerning the
qualified electronic transmission systems available to municipalities, including
recommendations for minimum security standards, voter privacy standards,
auditability, and verification technology.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385934 v.1